Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-27,153
Appeal; procedure.

(1) A party aggrieved by the issuance, refusal to issue, revocation, or modification of a pollution control tax refund may appeal from the finding and order of the Tax Commissioner. The finding and order shall not affect the authority of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment to determine whether or not industrial or agricultural waste pollution control exists within the meaning of the Air and Water Pollution Control Tax Refund Act. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(2) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall make its findings for the Air and Water Pollution Control Tax Refund Act in accordance with its normal administrative procedures. Nothing in the act is intended to affect the department's authority to make findings and to determine whether or not industrial or agricultural waste pollution control exists within the meaning of the act.

Laws 1972, LB 716, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 160;

Laws 2002, LB 989, § 23;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 99;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 392.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.